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Fuel Pump Control Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0230 on page DI−1 25.
WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0230 on page DI−1 25.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
When using hand−held tester:

1 Check fuel pump operation (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−7).

OK Go to step 8.

NG

2 Connect hand−held tester, and check operation of fuel pump relay.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / FUEL PUMP / SPD.
CHECK:
Check the operation of the fuel pump relay when it is switched ON and OFF by the hand−held tester.
OK:

Operating noise can be heard from the relay.

OK Go to step 4.

NG

3Checkoperationof fuelpumprelay (SeePub.No.RM630E,pageFI −54).

NG Replace fuel pump relay.

OK
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4 Check fuel pump (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−7).

NG Repair or replace fuel pump.

OK

5 Check circuit opening relay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−53).

NG Replace circuit opening relay.

OK

6 Check for open in harness and connector between EFI or ECD relay and fuel
pump, and fuel pump and body ground (See page IN−20).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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7 Check voltage between terminal FC and E1 of engine control ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal FC of the engine control
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 to 14 V

NG Check for open in harness and connector be-
tween battery and FC terminal of engine control
ECU (See page IN−20).

OK

Proceed to problem symptoms table
(See page DI−34).

8Checkfuelpumpresistor (SeePub.No.RM630E,pageFI −59).

NG Replace fuel pump resistor.

OK

Check for open in harness and connector between circuit opening relay and fuel pump resistor,
and fuel pump resistor and fuel pump (See page IN−20).
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When not using hand−held tester:

1 Check operation of fuel pump (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−7).

OK Go to step 7.

NG

2 Check operation of fuel pump relay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−54).

NG Replace fuel pump relay.

OK

3 Check fuel pump (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−7).

NG Repair or replace fuel pump.

OK

4 Check circuit opening relay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−53).

NG Replace circuit opening relay.

OK

5 Check for open in harness and connector between EFI or ECD relay and fuel
pump, and fuel pump and body ground (See page IN−20).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK



A19521 A19629

FC (+)

Engine Control ECU
Connector

E11

DI−246
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE

2UZ−FE ENGINE SUP (RM111 3E)

6 Check voltage between terminal FC of engine control ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal FC of the engine control
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 to 14 V

NG Check for open in harness and connector be-
tween battery and FC terminal of engine control
ECU (See page IN−20).

OK

Proceed to problem symptoms table
(See page DI−34).

7 Check fuel pump resistor (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−59).

NG Replace fuel pump resistor.

OK

Check for open in harness and connector between circuit opening relay and fuel pump resistor,
fuel pump resistor and fuel pump (See page IN−20).


